Wyoming, session 2026, SF0002.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. There is appropriated from the general
fund to the legislative service office the following
specified amounts, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
to pay the costs and expenses of the Wyoming legislature
through June 30, 2028:
SALARIES
LSO Staff Permanent/Temporary ..................$11,499,818
Legislators – Session ............................1,156,600
Legislators – Interim ...........................2,239,976
Session Staff ......................................575,608
Employer Paid Benefits ..........................4,906,076
IN-STATE TRAVEL
Mileage and Per Diem – Session ...................1,543,200
Mileage and Per Diem – Interim ...................1,252,390
OUT-OF-STATE TRAVEL
Travel Expenses .....................................93,800
Per Diem ...........................................128,800
DUES
National Conference of State Legislatures ..........293,524
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 1, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
The Energy Council ..................................76,800
Council of State Governments .......................271,346
Other ..............................................15,520
REGISTRATION FEES ...................................75,600
TELECOMMUNICATIONS ..................................50,000
ETS SERVICES (Network connections & backup) .........10,000
GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT ..................1,524,720
(Information technology, copying,
supplies and equipment, furniture,
contract services, special projects, etc.)
STATUTES, SESSION LAWS AND DIGESTS .................405,000
TOTAL ..........................................$26,118,778
Section 2. [Standard Provision-Flex]. The Management
Council may transfer funds from one expense category to
another under Section 1 of this act as the activities of
the legislature may require.
Section 3. [Standard Provision-Travel]. The
appropriation for out-of-state travel under this act shall
be used to reimburse legislators for documented legislative
travel and per diem expenses to attend out-of-state
meetings in accordance with policies of the Management
Council. In addition to other out-of-state travel
authorized in Management Council policies, Management
Council may approve out-of-state travel for legislators
that furthers the interests of the state of Wyoming. This
travel may include travel to meet with legislators or
legislative committees from other states and travel to
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 1, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
attend other meetings, conferences or events that further
the interests of the state of Wyoming.
Section 4. [Carry Forward of Prior Appropriations].
(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-4-207, the unobligated
portions of the following appropriations shall not revert
on June 30, 2026, and are hereby reappropriated to the
legislative service office for the following purposes:
(i) Any unexpended, unobligated amounts
reappropriated for expenditure by the legislative service
office under 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 59,
Sections 4(a)(i) and 7 and 2025 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 140, Section 2 are reappropriated for expenditure
by the legislative service office for the period commencing
July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028. Expenditures of
amounts reappropriated under this paragraph shall be for
professional consulting expertise and other support
necessary to carry out and execute work of the legislature
pertaining to required K-12 education responsibilities,
issues and studies. Professional consulting expertise may
be retained by the legislative service office only upon
approval of the Management Council, and the unexpended,
unobligated amounts may be expended for contractual
agreements between the Management Council and professional
consultants;
(ii) Any balance remaining on June 30, 2026,
resulting from the sale of legislative laptop computers
prior to that date is appropriated to the legislative
service office to be used for the purchase of replacement
laptop computers and support systems for the period
commencing July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 1, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) Any unexpended, unobligated amounts
appropriated for expenditure under 2024 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 59 are reappropriated for expenditure by the
legislative service office at the direction of the
Management Council for extraordinary expenses of the
legislature and as necessary to supplement any expense
category under this act, for the period commencing July 1,
2026 and ending June 30, 2028.
(b) This section is effective immediately.
Section 5. [New Legislator Training Compensation].
(a) From and after the date the state canvassing
board certifies the results of the 2026 general election in
accordance with W.S. 22-16-118, legislators elect and newly
appointed legislators may, to the extent authorized by the
Management Council, receive mileage and per diem at the
same rate as members of the legislature plus an amount
equal to the daily salary paid to legislators for each day
spent at a legislative training function or at a meeting of
an interim committee to which they will be assigned.
(b) There is appropriated from the general fund to
the legislative service office thirty-four thousand dollars
($34,000.00) for purposes of this section.
(c) As used in this section:
(i) "Legislator elect" means a person elected to
the legislature during the 2026 general election who is not
a current member of the legislature and before the person
is duly sworn in;
(ii) "Newly appointed legislator" means a person
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 1, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
appointed after the 2026 general election to fill a vacancy
in the House or Senate and before the person is duly sworn
in.
Section 6. [Economic Development Authorized Travel].
(a) Subject to available appropriation, legislators
traveling out-of-state, including internationally, in
connection with executive branch or legislatively approved
efforts to expand and diversify Wyoming's energy and
industrial economy or to attract new business enterprises to
the state or to improve access to and growth in domestic and
international markets, are authorized reimbursement of actual
travel expenses, including travel, lodging, meals and
necessary incidentals, provided:
(i) Reimbursement of travel expenses for members
of the legislature to participate in economic
development efforts under this section shall require the
approval of the Management Council;
(ii) In designating members authorized to
receive travel reimbursement under this section, preference
shall be given to members who have expressed an intention
to seek re-election to, or if mid-term to continue to
serve in, the Wyoming legislature during the 2027 and 2028
legislative sessions.
(b) This section is effective immediately.
Section 7. [Wyoming State Treasurer's Investment
Conference]. There is appropriated twenty thousand dollars
($20,000.00) from the general fund to the legislative
service office for payment of registration, mileage and per
diem for legislators attending the Wyoming state treasurer's
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 1, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
investment conference in the 2026 or 2027 interim.
Section 8. [Interpretive Exhibits and Wayfinding
Subcommittee].
(a) There is appropriated twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office to pay the salary, mileage and
per diem of the legislative members of the capitol
interpretive exhibits and wayfinding subcommittee created
by 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 140, Section 8(a).
(b) This section is effective immediately.
Section 9. [Economic Modeling]. There is
appropriated four hundred ninety-two thousand one hundred
dollars ($492,100.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office for regional economic modeling
software and maintenance fees for the 2027-2028 biennium to
support the legislative service office budget fiscal
division fiscal note process, the legislative service
office research division administrative rules economic
impact analysis and other projects and assignments of the
legislature as necessary.
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0002
ENROLLED ACT NO. 1, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 10. [Effective Dates].
(a) As used in this act, "effective immediately"
means effective immediately upon completion of all acts
necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article
4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Any appropriation
contained in this act that is effective immediately shall
not lapse until June 30, 2028, unless otherwise specified.
(b) Except as otherwise provided, this act is
effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
7